data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_PT_90.aff
SFX X Y 187
SFX X   r       -me            [aei]r
SFX X   r       -te            [aei]r
SFX X   r       -se            [ae]r
SFX X   r       -se-lhe        [ae]r
SFX X   r       -se-lhes       [ae]r
SFX X   r       -nos           [aei]r
SFX X   r       -vos           [aei]r
SFX X   r       -lhe           [aei]r
SFX X   r       -lhes          [aei]r
SFX X   r       -a             [aei]r
SFX X   r       -as            [aei]r
SFX X   r       -o             [aei]r
SFX X   r       -os            [aei]r
SFX X   ir       e-me            ir
SFX X   ir       e-te            ir
SFX X   ir       e-se            ir
SFX X   ir       e-se-lhe        ir
SFX X   ir       e-se-lhes       ir
SFX X   ir       e-nos           ir
SFX X   ir       e-vos           ir
SFX X   ir       e-lhe           ir
SFX X   ir       e-lhes          ir
SFX X   ir       e-a             ir
SFX X   ir       e-as            ir
SFX X   ir       e-o             ir
SFX X   ir       e-os            ir
SFX X   ar              o               [^-]ar          +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX X   r               s               ar              +P=2,N=s,T=p
SFX X   ar              a               [^-]ar          +P=3,N=s,T=p
SFX X   r               mos             ar              +P=1,N=p,T=p
SFX X   r               is              ar              +P=2,N=p,T=p
SFX X   r               m               ar              +P=3,N=p,T=p
SFX X   ar              e               [^cgç]ar        +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX X   car             que             car             +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX X   gar             gue             gar             +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX X   çar             ce              çar             +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX X   ar              es              [^cgç]ar        +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX X   car             ques            car             +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX X   gar             gues            gar             +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX X   çar             ces             çar             +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX X   ar              emos            [^cgç]ar        +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   ar              emo-nos         [^cgç]ar        +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   car             quemos          car             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   car             quemo-nos       car             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   gar             guemos          gar             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   gar             guemo-nos       gar             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   çar             cemos           çar             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   çar             cemo-nos        çar             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   ar              eis             [^cgç]ar        +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   car             queis           car             +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   gar             gueis           gar             +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   çar             ceis            çar             +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   ar              em              [^cgç]ar        +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   car             quem            car             +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   gar             guem            gar             +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   çar             cem             çar             +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   ar              a               [^-]ar          +P=2,N=s,T=i
SFX X   ar              e               [^cgç]ar        +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX X   car             que             car             +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX X   gar             gue             gar             +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX X   çar             ce              çar             +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX X   ar              emos            [^cgç]ar        +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX X   ar              emo-nos         [^cgç]ar        +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX X   car             quemos          car             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX X   car             quemo-nos       car             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX X   gar             guemos          gar             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX X   gar             guemo-nos       gar             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX X   çar             cemos           çar             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX X   çar             cemo-nos        çar             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX X   r               i               ar              +P=2,N=p,T=i
SFX X   ar              em              [^cgç]ar        +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX X   car             quem            car             +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX X   gar             guem            gar             +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX X   çar             cem             çar             +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX X   er              o               [^cug-]er       +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX X   cer             ço              cer             +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX X   ger             jo              ger             +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX X   guer            go              guer            +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX X   r               s               er              +P=2,N=s,T=p
SFX X   er              e               er              +P=3,N=s,T=p
SFX X   r               mos             er              +P=1,N=p,T=p
SFX X   r               is              er              +P=2,N=p,T=p
SFX X   r               m               er              +P=3,N=p,T=p
SFX X   er              a               [^cug-]er       +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX X   cer             ça              cer             +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX X   ger             ja              ger             +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX X   guer            ga              guer            +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX X   er              as              [^cug]er        +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX X   cer             ças             cer             +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX X   ger             jas             ger             +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX X   guer            gas             guer            +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX X   er              amos            [^cug]er        +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   er              amo-nos         [^cug]er        +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   cer             çamos           cer             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   cer             çamo-nos        cer             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   ger             jamos           ger             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   ger             jamo-nos        ger             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   guer            gamos           guer            +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   guer            gamo-nos        guer            +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   er              ais             [^cug]er        +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   cer             çais            cer             +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   ger             jais            ger             +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   guer            gais            guer            +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   er              am              [^cug]er        +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   cer             çam             cer             +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   ger             jam             ger             +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   guer            gam             guer            +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX X   er              e               er              +P=2,N=s,T=i
SFX X   er              a               [^cug^-]er      +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX X   cer             ça              cer             +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX X   ger             ja              ger             +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX X   guer            ga              guer            +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX X   er              amos            [^cu]er         +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX X   er              amo-nos         [^cu]er         +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX X   cer             çamos           cer             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX X   cer             çamo-nos        cer             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX X   ger             jamos           ger             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX X   ger             jamo-nos        ger             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX X   guer            gamos           guer            +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX X   guer            gamo-nos        guer            +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX X   r               i               er              +P=2,N=p,T=i
SFX X   er              am              [^cug]er        +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX X   cer             çam             cer             +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX X   ger             jam             ger             +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX X   guer            gam             guer            +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX X   ir              o               [^cug-]ir       +P=1,N=s,T=p
