data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_PT_90.dic
abdicar/XYPLcDnv
abonar/XYPLD
abusar/XYLD
acartar/XYPLM
achegar/XYPL
acobertar/XYPL
aconsoantar/XYPL
acromatizar/XYPL
adelgaçar/XYPLMD
administrar/XYPLcDn
adubar/XYPLcMD
aferrolhar/XYPLS
aflorar/XYPLcMn
afreguesar/XYPL
agigantar/XYPLM
agrilhoar/XYPLSM
ajardinar/XYPLM
albergar/XYPL
alegorizar/XYPLc
alforjar/XYPL
aliviar/XYPLMD
alterar/XYPLc
amachucar/XYPL
amarelecer/XYLM
amedrontar/XYPLMD
amolar/XYPLcD
amortiçar/XYPL
amurar/XYPL
angariar/XYPLcD
anonimizar/XYPL
anular/XYPLcMDnv
apancar/XYPLM
apatifar/XYPL
apetecer/XYPLv
apoderar/XYLM
apotentar/XYPL
aproar/XYPLM
aquecer/XYPLMDvR
arengar/XYLD
arrabujar/XYL
arredondar/XYPLM
arrepelar/XYPLcD
arroxar/XYPL
asneirar/XYPLcMD
assentar/XYPLMD
assocializar/XYPLc
atacanhar/XYPL
atemorizar/XYPLcMD
atintar/XY
atraiçoar/XYPLD
atumultuar/XYPLD
automobilizar/XYPL
avençar/XYPL
avivar/XYPLMD
bacanalizar/XYPL
balançar/XYPL
barafustar/XYL
beatificar/XYPLcDn
berregar/XYL
binoculizar/XYPL
bocejar/XYLD
borrar/XYPLD
brejeirar/XYL
bular/XYPL
cachoeirar/XYL
calcular/XYLDv
camurçar/XYPL
capar/XYPLcD
cardar/XY
carvoejar/XYL
catar/XYPLM
cavar/XYPLcD
cercar/XYPLD
chantajar/XYL
chirriar/XYLn
chuviscar/XYL
cirandar/XYPL
clarimostrar/XYPL
coadquirir/XYPLc
cofiar/XYPL
colmatar/XYPL
comocionar/XYPL
compensar/XYPLcDvS
comunitarizar/XYPLnc
concutir/XYPLv
confiscar/XYPLcv
conhecer/XYPLSMDnv
consorciar/XYPL
contemplar/XYPLcDnv
contrafortar/XYPL
contristar/XYPLcD
cooptar/XYPLc
correlatar/XYPL
cotizar/XYPLcv
criar/XYPLcDv
cubar/XYPL
danar/XYPLcMD
debutar/XYLn
decrepitar/XYLc
degenerar/XYLc
demandar/XYPLDn
deparar/XYPLv
derivar/XYPLcnv
desagastar/XYPLM
desapoiar/XYPL
desatarraxar/XYPL
desbordar/XYLn
descarrilar/XYPLM
desconceituar/XYPL
descortinar/XYPLv
desembolsar/XYPL
desencovar/XYPL
desenhar/XYPLRD
desentrelaçar/XYPL
desferrar/XYPL
desgastar/XYPLn
desintegrar/XYPLc
desmantelar/XYPLMD
desodorizar/XYPLn
despenitenciar/XYPL
despregar/XYPL
desselecionar/XYP
desunificar/XYPLc
desvirtuar/XYPLcM
diferençar/XYPLv
dinamizar/XYPLcnDR
disputar/XYPLDnv
ditar/XYPLD
domar/XYPLcDv
duplicar/XYPLcDnv
ejetar/XYPLv
emagrecer/XYPLM
embarretar/XYPL
emblemar/XYPL
embrutecer/XYPLMD
empancar/XYPLMS
empenhar/XYPLMDvB
empreitar/XYPL
encaixilhar/XYPL
encapoeirar/XYPL
encartar/XYPLScM
encestar/XYPS
encompridar/XYPL
encruzilhar/XYPL
endurecer/XYPLMD
enfeixar/XYPLM
enfunilar/XYPLM
englobar/XYPLMn
enjeitar/XYPLM
enredar/XYPL
ensacar/XYPLM
entalar/XYPLcD
entornar/XYPL
entroncar/XYPLM
enveredar/XYPL
epidemiar/XYPL
esbanjar/XYPLMD
escalfar/XYPL
escarpar/XYPL
escorraçar/XYPL
esfacelar/XYPLM
esgaravatar/XYPLMD
espairecer/XYPLM
especificar/XYPLcD
espirrar/XYPL
esquematizar/XYPL
estanhar/XYPLD
estipular/XYPLcDn
estrebuchar/XYLM
estuporar/XYPLn
evaporizar/XYPL
excrescer/XYLn
exortar/XYPLcD
expugnar/XYPLcDv
exular/XYL
falcatruar/XYPL
fantochar/XYL
fecundizar/XYPLn
ficar/XYL
fintar/XYPL
focalizar/XYPLc
fornicar/XYPLcD
fragilizar/XYPLnc
fulminar/XYPLcDn
galar/XYPLn
garimpar/XYL
generalizar/XYPLcDvB
goelar/XYL
grafar/XYPL
grisar/XYPL
halogenar/XYPLc
hifenizar/XYPLc
hospitalizar/XYPLc
ilibar/XYPLc
impactar/XYP
imprensar/XYPLD
inabitar/XYPLv
incomunicar/XYPLcnv
indeterminar/XYPLcv
industriar/XYPLD
inflacionar/XY
inocular/XYPLcDv
inteirar/XYPL
intrujar/XYPL
japonizar/XYPL
lambariscar/XYL
leigar/XYPL
livrar/XYPLcMD
madurar/XYPLD
manobrar/XYPLDv
mastigar/XYPLcD
melodramatizar/XYPL
migrar/XYLcDn
mofar/XY
motinar/XYPL
naufragar/XYLnv
nutrificar/XYPL
omitir/XYPL
ortografar/XYPL
palmejar/XYL
parvoeirar/XYL
pender/XYLn
perjurar/XYPL
pigarrear/XY
pojar/XYPLn
praguejar/XYPLMD
prendar/XYPL
probabilizar/XYPL
propulsar/XYPLn
putrificar/XYPL
raciocinar/XYLcDn
ratar/XYPL
rebatizar/XYPL
reclinar/XYPLc
redestilar/XYPL
refolhar/XYPLM
reinar/XYLn
rematar/XYPLcD
repastar/XYPL
reservar/XYPLD
restabelecer/XYPLM
retroverter/XYPL
rilhar/XYPLMD
rumar/XYPLc
sangrar/XYPLD
sensibilizar/XYPLcDnvS
singrar/XYL
sobrestimar/XYPL
sorver/XYPL
subsumir/XYPL
supliciar/XYPLD
tarefar/XYPL
tesoirar/XYPL
tornar/XYPL
transfundir/XYPLv
treplicar/XYPL
tumultuar/XYPLDn
vampirizar/XYPL
verrumar/XYPL
vitalizar/XYPLcDnS
zincar/XYPL
disciplinar/DLPXYcmnpv
salivar/LXYcmnp
